Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 1 Definitions and Establishment of Financial Institutions

19-1-1.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise specified, the following terms shall have the following meanings throughout this title:

“Agreement to form” means the agreement to form a financial institution or the agreement to form a credit union, as applicable, pursuant to this title, and includes, for financial institutions organized before December 31, 1995, the articles of incorporation or the agreement of association of the financial institution, where applicable.

“Branch” means any office or place of business, other than the main office or customer-bank-communication-terminal outlets as provided for in this title, at which deposits are received, or checks paid or money lent, or at which any trust powers are exercised. Any financial institution that had, on or before June 30, 2003, established an office or place of business, other than its main office, at which trust powers are exercised, shall not be required to obtain the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, pursuant to §

19-2-11

for any such offices established as of that date.

“Credit union” means a credit union duly organized under the laws of this state.

“Director” means the director of the department of business regulation, or the director’s designee.

“Division of banking” means the division within the department of business regulation responsible for the supervision and examination of regulated institutions and/or licensees under chapter 14 of this title.

“Federal credit union” means a credit union duly organized under the laws of the United States.

“Financial institution” means any entity, other than a credit union, duly organized under the laws of this state that has the statutory authority to accept money on deposit pursuant to title 19, including an entity that is prohibited from accepting deposits by its own bylaws or agreement to form; the term includes, but is not limited to banks, trust companies, savings banks, loan and investment banks, and savings and loan associations.

“Main office” means, in the case of financial institutions or credit unions, the location stated in the agreement to form, as amended, and, otherwise, the location recognized by the institution’s primary banking regulator as its main office.

“Person” means individuals, partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies, or any other entity however organized.

“Regulated institution” means any financial institution, credit union, or other insured-deposit-taking institution, that is authorized to do business in this state, including one authorized by operation of an interstate banking statute that allowed its original entry.

“Retail installment contract” means any security agreement negotiated or executed in this state, or under the laws of this state, including, but not limited to, any agreement in the nature of a mortgage, conditional sale contract, or any other agreement whether or not evidenced by any written instrument to pay the retail purchase price of goods, or any part thereof, in installments over any period of time and pursuant to which any security interest is retained or taken by the retail seller for the payment of the purchase price, or any part thereof, of the retail installment contract.

“Retail seller” means any person who sells or contracts to sell any goods under a retail installment contract to a retail buyer.

“Superintendent” means the deputy director designated by the director as superintendent of banking in the department of business regulation.

“Unimpaired capital” means the sum of all capital and allowance accounts minus estimated losses on assets, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

“Writing” means hard copy writing or electronic writing that meets the requirements of §

42-127.1-2(7)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 38; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 5.

19-1-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 38; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 20; P.L. 2006, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 435, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 50, § 2, effective June 3, 2013; P.L. 2013, ch. 57, § 2, effective June 3, 2013.

19-1-3.
Applications — General.

All applications filed by regulated institutions shall be made to the director, or the director’s designee, other than the exceptions set forth in this title.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall cause notice of applications filed to be published on the department’s website and by any other method deemed by the director, or the director’s designee, to communicate with persons who are, or may be, interested in the application. The notice shall include a provision allowing for a public comment period. During this period, the application shall be open for public inspection at the division of banking. If, at the end of the public comment period, there are no objectors to the application, the director, or the director’s designee, may approve or deny the application. If there are any objectors, the director, or the director’s designee, may hold a public hearing to take testimony, under oath, and after considering this testimony, shall approve or deny the application. Any applicant aggrieved by any order regarding an application may appeal pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

The superintendent shall collect a filing fee with respect to applications submitted to the division of banking for consideration. All fees pursuant to this section shall be paid to the director for the use of the state. The fees to be charged for each type of application shall be established by the division of banking by regulation.

The superintendent is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this section, including, but not limited to, the establishment of specific time periods within which a decision for the various types of applications must be rendered by the division of banking.

Any party adversely affected by a decision of the director, or the director’s designee, may make written demand upon the director, or the director’s designee, within thirty (30) days notification of the decision from which the party is appealing. A hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

Anyone adversely affected by a decision of the director, or the director’s designee, may appeal the decision by filing an appeal with the superior court pursuant to §

42-35-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 38; P.L. 1999, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 57, § 1.

19-1-4.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 38.